Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 26
SNOWMOBILES

Sec.

§ 49-2601, 49-2602. Purpose — Title of act. [Repealed.]

§ 49-2603 — 49-2611. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-2612. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-2613. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-2614. Violations of act — Misdemeanor

Accountable for property damage. [Repealed.]

§ 49-2615. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-2616. [Amended and Redesignated.]